Wisconsin, session 2025, SB282.
do enact as follows:SB282,11Section 1. 15.405 (7g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB282,2,11215.405 (7g) Board of nursing. There is created a board of nursing in the 3department of safety and professional services. The board of nursing shall consist 4of the following members appointed for staggered 4-year terms: 5 3 currently 5licensed registered nurses under ch. 441; one currently licensed practical nurse 6under ch. 441; one currently certified advanced practice nurse prescriber under ch. 7441; one nurse educator; one member who is either a licensed registered nurse or a 8licensed practical nurse under ch. 441; and 2 public members. Each registered 9nurse member shall have graduated from a program in professional nursing and 10each practical nurse member shall have graduated from a program in practical 11nursing accredited by the state in which the program was conducted.SB282,212Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB282,2,1713(1) Of the members of the board of nursing who were appointed as currently 14licensed registered nurses under ch. 441 pursuant to s. 15.405 (7g), the position of 15the 2 such members whose terms expire the earliest following the effective date of 16this subsection shall be replaced by a currently certified advanced practice nurse 17prescriber under ch. 441 and a nurse educator after their terms expire.SB282,2,1818